nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Fietsen > Fietsonderdelen > Fietswielonderdelen: Voetsteunen voor fietsen; Naafonderdelen voor fietsen; Fietsnaven; Velglinten voor fietsen; Fietsspaken; Assen en snelspanners voor fietswielen; Decalkits voor fietswielen; Fietswielnippels; Fietswielvelgen; Spacers en shims voor fietswielen
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Đạp xe > Phụ tùng xe đạp > Phụ tùng bánh xe đạp: Chốt để chân xe đạp; Phụ tùng trục bánh xe đạp; Moay-ơ xe đạp; Lót vành xe đạp; Nan hoa xe đạp; Trục bánh xe đạp; Bộ decal bánh xe đạp; Chốt vặn nan hoa xe đạp; Vành bánh xe đạp; Vòng chêm & miếng chêm bánh xe đạp
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Kolarstwo > Części rowerowe > Części kół rowerowych: Pegi rowerowe; Części piast rowerowych; Piasty rowerowe; Opaski na obręcze rowerowe; Szprychy rowerowe; Osie i szprychy do rowerów; Zestawy naklejek na koła rowerowe; Nyple rowerowe; Obręcze rowerowe; Podkładki dystansowe kół rowerowych
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Cyklistika > Díly jízdních kol > Díly na kola jízdních kol: Stupačky (pegy) na jízdní kola; Díly pro náboje kol; Náboje pro jízdní kola; Pásky do ráfků jízdních kol; Paprsky kola; Osy a rychloupínáky na jízdní kola; Sady samolepek na ráfky; Matice paprsku kola; Ráfky na kola; Podložky a vložky do zapletených kol
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 單車 > 自行車零件 > 自行車輪胎零組件: 自行車腳踏桿; 自行車花鼓零件; 自行車輪轂; 自行車內襯帶; 自行車輻條; 自行車軸心/快拆; 自行車輪組貼紙組; 自行車輪螺母; 自行車輪圈; 自行車輪組墊片與調整片
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Ciclismo > Piezas para bicicletas > Piezas de ruedas para bicicletas: Reposapiés para bicicletas; Repuestos para bicicletas; Concentradores para bicicletas; Fondos de llanta para bicicletas; Radios para bicicletas; Ejes y sujeciones rápidas para bicicletas; Kits de calcomanías para ruedas de bicicleta; Conectores para ruedas de bicicletas; Llantas de rueda para bicicletas; Espaciadores y cuñas de rueda de bicicleta
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > ปั่นจักรยาน > อะไหล่จักรยาน > ชิ้นส่วนล้อจักรยาน: ที่วางเท้าจักรยาน; ชิ้นส่วนฮับจักรยาน; ฮับจักรยาน; แถบขอบล้อจักรยาน; ซี่ล้อจักรยาน; เพลาและซี่ล้อจักรยาน; ชุดสติกเกอร์ล้อจักรยาน; จุกล้อจักรยาน; ขอบล้อจักรยาน; สเปเซอร์และแผ่นชิมล้อจักรยาน
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Езда на велосипеде > Детали для велосипедов > Детали колес для велосипедов: Пеги для велосипедов; Детали велосипедных втулок; Велосипедные втулки; Велосипедные ободные ленты; Велосипедные спицы; Оси и эксцентрики для колес для велосипедов; Наборы наклеек на велосипедные колеса; Ниппели для колес для велосипедов; Ободья колес для велосипедов; Проставочные кольца и шайбы для велосипедных колес
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Колоездене > Части за велосипеди > Части за велосипедни колела: Пегове за велосипед; Части за главина на велосипед; Главини на велосипед; Бандажни ленти за капли на велосипеди; Велосипедни спици; Оси и шишове за бързо освобождаване за колела на велосипеди; Комплекти стикери за велосипедни колела; Нипли за колело на велосипед; Велосипедни джанти; Дистанционери и подложки за велосипедни колела
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Bisiklet > Bisiklet Parçaları > Bisiklet Tekerlek Parçaları: Bisiklet Ayaklıkları; Bisiklet Göbeği Parçaları; Bisiklet Orta Göbekleri; Bisiklet Jant Şeritleri; Bisiklet Jant Telleri; Bisiklet Tekerlek Aksları; Bisiklet tekerlek etiket kitleri; Bisiklet Jant Teli Vidaları; Bisiklet Jantları; Bisiklet tekerlek ara parçaları ve şimleri
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Radfahren > Fahrradbauteile > Fahrradräderzubehör: Fahrradfußrasten; Fahrradnabenteile; Fahrradnaben; Felgenbänder; Fahrradspeichen; Fahrradachsen & -spanner; Aufkleber-Sets für Fahrrad-Laufräder; Speichennippel; Fahrradfelgen; Distanzringe & Passscheiben für Fahrrad-Laufräder
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Biciklizam > Dijelovi za bicikle > Dijelovi za kotače za bicikle: Noge za bicikle; Dijelovi glavčine za bicikle; Glavčine za bicikle; Trake za obruč za bicikle; Žbice za bicikl; Osovine i šipke za kotače bicikala; Kompleti naljepnica za kotač za bicikl; Vijci za kotače za bicikle; Naplatci za kotače za bicikle; Odstojnici i podlošci za kotač za bicikl
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Pyöräily > Polkupyörän osat > Polkupyörän kiekon osat: Polkupyörän jalkatapit; Polkupyörän napojen osat; Polkupyörän navat; Polkupyörän vannenauhat; Polkupyörän pinnat; Polkupyörän akselit ja pikalinkut; Kiekkojen tarrasarjat; Polkupyörän pinnojen ruuvit; Polkupyörän vanteet; Polkupyörän vanteiden prikat ja sovitteet
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Bicyklovanie > Diely pre bicykle > Diely kolies bicykla: Stupačky na bicykel; Časti náboja bicykla; Náboje na bicykle; Pásy na ráfiky bicyklov; Priečky na bicykle; Náprava a predná os bicyklov; Sady nálepiek na bicyklové kolesá; Nipple na kolesá bicykla; Ráfiky na kolesá bicykla; Rozpery a podložky pre kolesá bicyklov
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Ciclismo > Peças de bicicleta > Peças de rodas de bicicleta: Apoio para os pés para bicicleta; Peças de quadro de bicicleta; Eixos para bicicletas; Fitas protetoras para rodas de bicicleta; Raios de bicicleta; Eixos de rodas de bicicleta; Kits de adesivos para roda de bicicleta; Bocais roscados para rodas de bicicleta; Aros para rodas de bicicletas; Espaçadores e calços de roda de bicicleta
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Cykling > Cykeldelar > Delar till cykelhjul: Fotpinnar för cykel; Navdelar till cykelhjul; Cykelnav; Fälgband för cyklar; Cykelekrar; Hjulaxlar och snabbkopplingar för cykelhjul; Dekalkit för cykelhjul; Nipplar till cykelhjul; Cykelfälgar; Distanser och shims för cykelhjul
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 自行车用品 > 自行车零配件 > 自行车轮零件: 自行车脚踏杆; 自行车轮毂部件; 自行车轮毂; 自行车车圈条; 自行车轮辐条; 自行车轮轴和快拆; 自行车轮组贴花套件; 自行车车轮辐条帽; 自行车轮圈; 自行车轮组垫圈和垫片
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 사이클링 > 자전거 부품 > 자전거 바퀴 부품: 자전거 보조 발판; 자전거 허브 부품; 자전거 허브; 자전거 림 스트립; 자전거 바큇살; 자전거 바퀴 축/스큐어; 자전거 휠 데칼 키트; 자전거 바퀴 니플; 자전거 바퀴 림; 자전거 휠 스페이서 및 심
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Ciclismo > Parti per bicicletta > Parti per ruote bicicletta: Pedali con dentatura per bicicletta; Parti per mozzo di biciclette; Mozzi per bicicletta; Nastro per cerchioni di bicicletta; Raggi per bicicletta; Assi e raggi per ruote di bicicletta; Kit di adesivi per ruote della bicicletta; Cappucci valvola bicicletta; Cerchi ruote bicicletta; Distanziali e spessori per ruote della bicicletta
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Ciclism > Piese pentru biciclete > Piese pentru roți biciclete: Punți pentru pedale pentru biciclete; Piese pentru butuc pentru biciclete; Butuci pentru biciclete; Benzi pentru jante de biciclete; Spițe pentru biciclete; Osii pentru roți de bicicletă; Kit de autocolante pentru roți de bicicletă; Nipluri pentru roți de biciclete; Jante pentru biciclete; Distanțiere și șaibe pentru roțile bicicletei
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Dviračių sportas > Dviračių dalys > Dviračių ratų dalys: Dviračių pėdų atramos; Dviračių stebulės dalys; Dviračių stebulės; Dviračių ratlankių juostos; Dviračių stipinai; Dviračių ratų ašys ir ašys su rankenėlėmis; Dviračių ratų lipdukų rinkiniai; Dviračių ratų ventiliai; Dviračių ratlankiai; Dviračių ratų tarpikliai ir tarpiklės
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Cykling > Cykeldele > Cykelhjuldele: Fodstøtter til cykler; Cykelnavdele; Cykelnav; Fælgtape til cykler; Cykeleger; Aksler og quick release til cykler; Klistermærkesæt til cykelhjul; Nipler til cykelhjul; Cykelfælge; Afstandsstykker og shims til cykelhjul
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Kolesarjenje > Kolesarski deli > Deli za kolesa: Kolesarske stopalke; Deli pesta za kolesa; Kolesarska pesta; Trakovi za kolesarska platišča; Kolesarske napere; Osi in zobniki za kolesa; Kompleti nalepk za obroč kolesa; Nastavki za kolesa; Kolesarski plašči; Distančniki in podložke za kolesa
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Cycling > Bicycle Parts > Bicycle Wheel Parts: Bicycle Foot Pegs; Bicycle Hub Parts; Bicycle Hubs; Bicycle Rim Strips; Bicycle Spokes; Bicycle Wheel Axles & Skewers; Bicycle Wheel Decal Kits; Bicycle Wheel Nipples; Bicycle Wheel Rims; Bicycle Wheel Spacers & Shims
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > サイクリング > 自転車パーツ > 自転車ホイールパーツ: 自転車用フットペグ; 自転車車軸用部品; 自転車ハブ; 自転車用リムテープ; 自転車スポーク; 自転車用車軸・スキュワー; 自転車用ホイールデカールキット; 自転車ホイールニップル; 自転車ホイールリム; 自転車用ホイールスペーサー・シム
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Vélo > Pièces détachées vélo > Pièces pour roues de vélo: Repose-pieds de vélo; Pièces de rechange pour moyeux; Moyeux de vélo; Fonds de jante; Rayons de vélo; Arbres de roues; Kits d’autocollants pour roue de vélo; Écrous pour rayons de vélo; Jantes de vélo; Entretoises et cales de roue de vélo
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Kerékpározás > Kerékpáralkatrészek > Kerékpárkerék-alkatrészek: Kerékpárlábkampók; Kerékpáragy-alkatrészek; Kerékpáragyak; Kerékpárfelnicsíkok; Kerékpárküllők; Kerékpártengelyek és -nyársak; Kerékpár kerékmatrica-készletek; Kerékpárkerék-anyák; Kerékpárkerék-tárcsák; Kerékpárkerék-távtartók és hézagoló alátétek
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ποδηλασία > Ανταλλακτικά ποδηλάτου > Μέρη τροχών ποδηλάτου: Μαρκούτσια ποδιών ποδηλάτου; Μέρη πλήμνης ποδηλάτου; Πλήμνες ποδηλάτου; Ταινίες ζάντας ποδηλάτου; Ακτίνες ποδηλάτου; Άξονες & καλαμάκια τροχών ποδηλάτου; Κιτ αυτοκόλλητων τροχών ποδηλάτου; Εξαρτήματα ζάντας ποδηλάτου; Ζάντες ποδηλάτου; Αποστάτες & ροδέλες τροχών ποδηλάτου
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Ciclismo > Peças para bicicleta > Peças de rodas para bicicleta: Peseiras para bicicleta; Peças de cubo para bicicleta; Cubos para bicicleta; Fitas de jante para bicicleta; Raios para bicicleta; Eixos e apertos rápidos de roda para bicicleta; Kits de autocolantes para roda de bicicleta; Bicos de roda para bicicleta; Jantes de roda para bicicleta; Espaçadores e anilhas de roda de bicicleta
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Sykling > Sykkeldeler > Sykkelhjuldeler: Fotstøtter til sykkel; Navdeler til sykkel; Sykkelnav; Felgstriper til sykkel; Sykkeleiker; Hjulaksler og -koblinger; Klistremerkesett til sykkelhjul; Hjulnipler til sykkel; Sykkelfelger; Avstandsstykker og skiver til sykkelhjul